test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-salt_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - salt: # Verb 'eng freeze/fin pakastaa' - _SALT_ full paradigm /http://ezis.ailab.lv:8182/inflect/json/en/salt/
     salt+V+IV+Inf: salt
     salt+V+IV+Ind+Act+Fut+Sg1: salšu
     salt+V+IV+Ind+Act+Fut+Sg2: salsi
     salt+V+IV+Ind+Act+Fut+Pl1: salsim
     salt+V+IV+Ind+Act+Fut+Pl2: salsiet
     salt+V+IV+Ind+Act+Fut+SP3: sals

     salt+V+IV+Ind+Act+Prs+Sg1: salstu
     salt+V+IV+Ind+Act+Prs+Sg2: salsti
     salt+V+IV+Ind+Act+Prs+Pl1: salstam
     salt+V+IV+Ind+Act+Prs+Pl2: salstat
     salt+V+IV+Ind+Act+Prs+SP3: salst

     salt+V+IV+Ind+Act+Prt+Sg1: salu
     salt+V+IV+Ind+Act+Prt+Sg2: sali
     salt+V+IV+Ind+Act+Prt+Pl1: salām
     salt+V+IV+Ind+Act+Prt+Pl2: salāt
     salt+V+IV+Ind+Act+Prt+SP3: sala

     salt+V+IV+Deb+Prs: jāsalst
     salt+V+IV+Quo+Prs: salstot
     salt+V+IV+Quo+Fut: salšot
     salt+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: salsti
     salt+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: salstiet

     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: salstošs
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: salstoša
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: salstošam
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: salstošu
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef: salstošā
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: salstoši
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: salstošu
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: salstošiem
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: salstošus
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef: salstošos
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: salstošais
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: salstošā
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: salstošajam
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: salstošo
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def: salstošajā
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def: [salstošais, salstošo]
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: salstošie
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: salstošo
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: salstošajiem
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: salstošos
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def: salstošajos
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def: salstošie
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: salstoša
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: salstošas
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: salstošai
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: salstošu
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef: salstošā
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: salstošas
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: salstošu
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: salstošām
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: salstošas
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef: salstošās
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: salstošā
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: salstošās
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: salstošajai
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: salstošo
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def: salstošajā
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def: salstošā
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: salstošās
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: salstošo
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: salstošajām
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: salstošās
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def: salstošajās
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def: salstošās

     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: salis
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: saluša
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: salušam
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: salušu
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef: salušā
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: saluši
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: salušu
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: salušiem
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: salušus
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef: salušos
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: salušais
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: salušā
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: salušajam
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: salušo
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def: salušajā
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def: salušais
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: salušie
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: salušo
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: salušajiem
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: salušos
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def: salušajos
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def: salušie
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: salusi
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: salušas
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: salušai
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: salušu
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef: salušā
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: salušas
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: salušu
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: salušām
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: salušas
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef: salušās
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: salusī
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: salušās
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: salušajai
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: salušo
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def: salušajā
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def: salusī
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: salušās
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: salušo
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: salušajām
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: salušās
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def: salušajās
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def: salušās

     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: salstams
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: salstama
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: salstamam
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: salstamu
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef: salstamā
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: salstami
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: salstamu
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: salstamiem
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: salstamus
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef: salstamos
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: salstamais
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: salstamā
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: salstamajam
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: salstamo
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def: salstamajā
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def: [salstamais, salstamo]
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: salstamie
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: salstamo
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: salstamajiem
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: salstamos
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def: salstamajos
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def: salstamie
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: salstama
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: salstamas
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: salstamai
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: salstamu
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef: salstamā
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: salstamas
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: salstamu
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: salstamām
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: salstamas
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef: salstamās
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: salstamā
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: salstamās
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: salstamajai
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: salstamo
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def: salstamajā
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def: salstamā
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: salstamās
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: salstamo
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: salstamajām
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: salstamās
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def: salstamajās
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def: salstamās

     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: salts
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: salta
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: saltam
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: saltu
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef: saltā
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: salti
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: saltu
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: saltiem
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: saltus
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef: saltos
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: saltais
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: saltā
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: saltajam
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: salto
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def: saltajā
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def: saltais
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: saltie
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: salto
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: saltajiem
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: saltos
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def: saltajos
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def: saltie
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: salta
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: saltas
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: saltai
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: saltu
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef: saltā
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: saltas
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: saltu
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: saltām
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: saltas
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef: saltās
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: saltā
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: saltās
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: saltajai
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: salto
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def: saltajā
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def: saltā
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: saltās
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: salto
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: saltajām
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: saltās
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def: saltajās
     salt+V+IV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def: saltās
#"Declension":"4"
     salt+V+IV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: salšana
     salt+V+IV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: salšanas
     salt+V+IV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: salšanai
     salt+V+IV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Acc: salšanu
     salt+V+IV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Loc: salšanā
     salt+V+IV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Voc: salšana
     salt+V+IV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: salšanas
     salt+V+IV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: salšanu
     salt+V+IV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: salšanām
     salt+V+IV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Acc: salšanas
     salt+V+IV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Loc: salšanās
     salt+V+IV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Voc: salšanas
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: saldams
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: saldama
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: saldami
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: saldamas

#     salt+V+IV+Der/Adv+Adv+Pos: rokoši


     salt+V+IV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: saliens
     salt+V+IV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: saliena
     salt+V+IV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: salienam
     salt+V+IV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Acc: salienu
     salt+V+IV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Loc: salienā
     salt+V+IV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Voc: [saliens, salien]
     salt+V+IV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: salieni
     salt+V+IV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: salienu
     salt+V+IV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: salieniem
     salt+V+IV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Acc: salienus
     salt+V+IV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Loc: salienos
     salt+V+IV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Voc: salieni

     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2: salstot
     salt+V+IV+PrsPrc+Pss+Pred2: salstam
     salt+V+IV+Cond: saltu
     salt+V+IV+Deb+Quo: jāsalstot
